src/fst/test/gt-dict-yamls/dict-gt-yamls/N-lex_solla_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

# ok

Tests:

  Noun - sollâ:
    sollâ+N+Sg+Nom: sollâ
    sollâ+N+Sg+Gen: soolâ
    sollâ+N+Sg+Acc: soolâ
    sollâ+N+Sg+Ill: sooḷân
    sollâ+N+Sg+Loc: soolâst
    sollâ+N+Sg+Com: sooláin
    sollâ+N+Sg+Abe: soˊlâttáá
    sollâ+N+Ess: sollân
    sollâ+N+Par: sollâd
    sollâ+N+Pl+Nom: soolah
    sollâ+N+Pl+Gen: [soolâi, soˊlâi]
    sollâ+N+Pl+Acc: soolâid
    sollâ+N+Pl+Ill: sooláid
    sollâ+N+Pl+Loc: soolâin
    sollâ+N+Pl+Com: soˊlâiguin
    sollâ+N+Pl+Abe: soˊlâittáá

  Noun - tullâ:
    tullâ+N+Sg+Nom: tullâ
    tullâ+N+Sg+Gen: tuulâ
    tullâ+N+Sg+Acc: tuulâ
    tullâ+N+Sg+Ill: tuuḷân
    tullâ+N+Sg+Loc: tuulâst
    tullâ+N+Sg+Com: tuuláin
    tullâ+N+Sg+Abe: tuˊlâttáá
    tullâ+N+Ess: tullân
    tullâ+N+Par: tullâd
    tullâ+N+Pl+Nom: tuulah
    tullâ+N+Pl+Gen: [tuulâi, tuˊlâi]
    tullâ+N+Pl+Acc: tuulâid
    tullâ+N+Pl+Ill: tuuláid
    tullâ+N+Pl+Loc: tuulâin
    tullâ+N+Pl+Com: tuˊlâiguin
    tullâ+N+Pl+Abe: tuˊlâittáá

  Noun - kunnâ:
    kunnâ+N+Sg+Nom: kunnâ
    kunnâ+N+Sg+Gen: kuunâ
    kunnâ+N+Sg+Acc: kuunâ
    kunnâ+N+Sg+Ill: kuuṇân
    kunnâ+N+Sg+Loc: kuunâst
    kunnâ+N+Sg+Com: kuunáin
    kunnâ+N+Sg+Abe: kuˊnâttáá
    kunnâ+N+Ess: kunnân
    kunnâ+N+Par: kunnâd
    kunnâ+N+Pl+Nom: kuunah
    kunnâ+N+Pl+Gen: [kuunâi, kuˊnâi]
    kunnâ+N+Pl+Acc: kuunâid
    kunnâ+N+Pl+Ill: kuunáid
    kunnâ+N+Pl+Loc: kuunâin
    kunnâ+N+Pl+Com: kuˊnâiguin
    kunnâ+N+Pl+Abe: kuˊnâittáá

  Noun - korrâ:
    korrâ+N+Sg+Nom: korrâ
    korrâ+N+Sg+Gen: koorâ
    korrâ+N+Sg+Acc: koorâ
    korrâ+N+Sg+Ill: kooṛân
    korrâ+N+Sg+Loc: koorâst
    korrâ+N+Sg+Com: kooráin
    korrâ+N+Sg+Abe: koˊrâttáá
    korrâ+N+Ess: korrân
    korrâ+N+Par: korrâd
    korrâ+N+Pl+Nom: koorah
    korrâ+N+Pl+Gen: [koorâi, koˊrâi]
    korrâ+N+Pl+Acc: koorâid
    korrâ+N+Pl+Ill: kooráid
    korrâ+N+Pl+Loc: koorâin
    korrâ+N+Pl+Com: koˊrâiguin
    korrâ+N+Pl+Abe: koˊrâittáá

  Noun - čiŋŋâ:
    čiŋŋâ+N+Sg+Nom: čiŋŋâ
    čiŋŋâ+N+Sg+Gen: čiiŋâ
    čiŋŋâ+N+Sg+Acc: čiiŋâ
    čiŋŋâ+N+Sg+Ill: čiiŋ̣ân
    čiŋŋâ+N+Sg+Loc: čiiŋâst
    čiŋŋâ+N+Sg+Com: čiiŋáin
    čiŋŋâ+N+Sg+Abe: čiˊŋâttáá
    čiŋŋâ+N+Ess: čiŋŋân
    čiŋŋâ+N+Par: čiŋŋâd
    čiŋŋâ+N+Pl+Nom: čiiŋah
    čiŋŋâ+N+Pl+Gen: [čiiŋâi, čiˊŋâi]
    čiŋŋâ+N+Pl+Acc: čiiŋâid
    čiŋŋâ+N+Pl+Ill: čiiŋáid
    čiŋŋâ+N+Pl+Loc: čiiŋâin
    čiŋŋâ+N+Pl+Com: čiˊŋâiguin
    čiŋŋâ+N+Pl+Abe: čiˊŋâittáá

  Noun - juŋŋâ:
    juŋŋâ+N+Sg+Nom: juŋŋâ
    juŋŋâ+N+Sg+Gen: juuŋâ
    juŋŋâ+N+Sg+Acc: juuŋâ
    juŋŋâ+N+Sg+Ill: juuŋ̣ân
    juŋŋâ+N+Sg+Loc: juuŋâst
    juŋŋâ+N+Sg+Com: juuŋáin
    juŋŋâ+N+Sg+Abe: juˊŋâttáá
    juŋŋâ+N+Ess: juŋŋân
    juŋŋâ+N+Par: juŋŋâd
    juŋŋâ+N+Pl+Nom: juuŋah
    juŋŋâ+N+Pl+Gen: [juuŋâi, juˊŋâi]
    juŋŋâ+N+Pl+Acc: juuŋâid
    juŋŋâ+N+Pl+Ill: juuŋáid
    juŋŋâ+N+Pl+Loc: juuŋâin
    juŋŋâ+N+Pl+Com: juˊŋâiguin
    juŋŋâ+N+Pl+Abe: juˊŋâittáá

  Noun - šoŋŋâ: #SOLLA
    šoŋŋâ+N+Sg+Nom: šoŋŋâ
    šoŋŋâ+N+Sg+Gen: šooŋâ
    šoŋŋâ+N+Sg+Acc: šooŋâ
    šoŋŋâ+N+Sg+Ill: šooŋ̣ân
    šoŋŋâ+N+Sg+Loc: šooŋâst
    šoŋŋâ+N+Sg+Com: šooŋáin
    šoŋŋâ+N+Sg+Abe: šoˊŋâttáá
    šoŋŋâ+N+Ess:    šoŋŋân
    šoŋŋâ+N+Par:    šoŋŋâd
    šoŋŋâ+N+Pl+Nom: šooŋah
    šoŋŋâ+N+Pl+Gen: [šooŋâi, šoˊŋâi] 
    šoŋŋâ+N+Pl+Acc: šooŋâid
    šoŋŋâ+N+Pl+Ill: šooŋáid
    šoŋŋâ+N+Pl+Loc: šooŋâin
    šoŋŋâ+N+Pl+Com: šoˊŋâiguin
    šoŋŋâ+N+Pl+Abe: šoˊŋâittáá

  Noun - kurrâ: # 2B SOLLA
    kurrâ+N+Sg+Nom: kurrâ
    kurrâ+N+Sg+Gen: kuurâ
    kurrâ+N+Sg+Acc: kuurâ
    kurrâ+N+Sg+Ill: kuuṛân
    kurrâ+N+Sg+Loc: kuurâst
    kurrâ+N+Sg+Com: kuuráin
    kurrâ+N+Sg+Abe: kuˊrâttáá
    kurrâ+N+Ess:  kurrân
    kurrâ+N+Par:   kurrâd
    kurrâ+N+Pl+Nom: kuurah
    kurrâ+N+Pl+Gen: [kuurâi, kuˊrâi]
    kurrâ+N+Pl+Acc: kuurâid
    kurrâ+N+Pl+Ill: kuuráid
    kurrâ+N+Pl+Loc: kuurâin
    kurrâ+N+Pl+Com: kuˊrâiguin
    kurrâ+N+Pl+Abe: kuˊrâittáá

  Noun - ruttâ:
    ruttâ+N+Sg+Nom: ruttâ
    ruttâ+N+Sg+Gen: ruuđâ
    ruttâ+N+Sg+Acc: ruuđâ
    ruttâ+N+Sg+Ill: ruutân
    ruttâ+N+Sg+Loc: ruuđâst
    ruttâ+N+Sg+Com: ruuđáin
    ruttâ+N+Sg+Abe: ruˊđâttáá
    ruttâ+N+Ess:    ruttân
    ruttâ+N+Par:    ruttâd
    ruttâ+N+Pl+Nom: ruuđah
    ruttâ+N+Pl+Gen: [ruuđâi, ruˊđâi] 
    ruttâ+N+Pl+Acc: ruuđâid
    ruttâ+N+Pl+Ill: ruuđáid
    ruttâ+N+Pl+Loc: ruuđâin
    ruttâ+N+Pl+Com: ruˊđâiguin
    ruttâ+N+Pl+Abe: ruˊđâittáá

  Noun - vuojâ:
    vuojâ+N+Sg+Nom: vuoj̣â
    vuojâ+N+Sg+Gen: vuojâ
    vuojâ+N+Sg+Acc: vuojâ
    vuojâ+N+Sg+Ill: vuoj̣ân
    vuojâ+N+Sg+Loc: vuojâst
    vuojâ+N+Sg+Com: vuojáin
    vuojâ+N+Sg+Abe: vuoˊjâttáá
    vuojâ+N+Ess: vuoijân
    vuojâ+N+Par: vuoijâd
    vuojâ+N+Pl+Nom: vuojah
    vuojâ+N+Pl+Gen: [vuojâi, vuoˊjâi]
    vuojâ+N+Pl+Acc: vuojâid
    vuojâ+N+Pl+Ill: vuojáid 
    vuojâ+N+Pl+Loc: vuojâin
    vuojâ+N+Pl+Com: vuoˊjâiguin
    vuojâ+N+Pl+Abe: vuoˊjâittáá

  Noun - luččâ:
    luččâ+N+Sg+Nom: luččâ
    luččâ+N+Sg+Gen: luuj̣â
    luččâ+N+Sg+Acc: luuj̣â
    luččâ+N+Sg+Ill: luučân
    luččâ+N+Sg+Loc: luuj̣âst
    luččâ+N+Sg+Com: luuj̣áin
    luččâ+N+Sg+Abe: luˊj̣âttáá
    luččâ+N+Ess: luččân
    luččâ+N+Par: luččâd
    luččâ+N+Pl+Nom: luuj̣ah
    luččâ+N+Pl+Gen: [luuj̣âi, luˊj̣âi]
    luččâ+N+Pl+Acc: luuj̣âid
    luččâ+N+Pl+Ill: luuj̣áid
    luččâ+N+Pl+Loc: luuj̣âin
    luččâ+N+Pl+Com: luˊj̣âiguin
    luččâ+N+Pl+Abe: luˊj̣âittáá
